Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Financing of Tourism Development

148.850.
Tourism Development Finance Authority created — Members — Terms — Conflicts of interest — Powers.

The Tourism Development Finance Authority is created within the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet. The authority shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the Governor, at least one (1) of whom shall represent individuals with professional experience in financial management or economic development. The members of the authority shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement for their necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties. Of the members initially appointed to the authority, two (2) members shall be appointed for terms of one (1) year, three (3) members shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years, and two (2) members shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years. Thereafter, the members of the authority shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years.

The Governor shall appoint one (1) member as chairperson of the Tourism Development Finance Authority. The members of the authority may elect other officers as they deem necessary.

No member of the Tourism Development Finance Authority shall either directly or indirectly be a party to, or be in any manner interested in, any contract or agreement with the authority for any matter, cause, or thing that creates any liability or indebtedness against the authority.

The Tourism Development Finance Authority shall have the powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, KRS 139.536, and KRS 148.851 to 148.860, including but not limited to the power to:

Employ fiscal consultants, attorneys, appraisers, and other agents on behalf of the authority whom the authority deems necessary or convenient for the preparation and administration of agreements and documents necessary or incidental to any project. The fees for the services provided by persons employed on behalf of the authority shall be paid by the beneficiary of a loan under this program directly to the person providing consultation, advisory, legal, or other services; and

Impose and collect fees and charges in connection with any transaction and provide for reasonable penalties for delinquent payment of fees and charges.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 1, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 95, § 23, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 26, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 132, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 156, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

148.851.
Definitions for KRS 148.851 to 148.860.

As used in 148.851 to 148.860, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Agreement” means the tourism development agreement entered into between the authority and an approved company;

“Approved company” means any eligible company that has received final approval to receive incentives provided under KRS 148.853;

“Approved costs” means the amount of eligible costs approved by the authority upon completion of the project;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Tourism Development Finance Authority as set forth in KRS 148.850;

“Cabinet” means the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet;

“Crafts and products center” means a facility primarily devoted to the display, promotion, and sale of Kentucky products, and at which a minimum of eighty percent (80%) of the sales occurring at the facility are of Kentucky arts, crafts, or agricultural products;

“Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity operating or intending to operate a tourism development project;

“Eligible costs” means:

Obligations incurred for labor and amounts paid to vendors, contractors, subcontractors, builders, suppliers, deliverymen, and materialmen in connection with the acquisition, construction, equipping, and installation of a tourism development project;

The costs of acquiring real property or rights include the acquisition of real property by a leasehold interest with a minimum term of ten (10) years, and any costs incidental thereto;

The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the course of the acquisition, construction, equipping, and installation of a tourism development project which is not paid by the vendor, supplier, deliveryman, contractor, or otherwise provided;

All costs of architectural and engineering services, including but not limited to estimates, plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction and installation, as well as for the performance of all the duties required by or consequent to the acquisition, construction, equipping, and installation of a tourism development project;

All costs required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the acquisition, construction, equipping, and installation of a tourism development project;

All costs required for the installation of utilities, including but not limited to water, sewer, sewer treatment, gas, electricity and communications, and including off-site construction of the facilities paid for by the approved company; and

All other costs comparable with those described in this subsection, excluding costs subject to refund under KRS 154.20-202, 154.20-204, 154.20-206, 154.20-208, and 154.20-210 or Subchapter 31 of KRS Chapter 154;

“Enhanced incentive county” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Entertainment destination center project” means a facility that meets the requirements of KRS 148.853(2)(b);

“Final approval” means the action taken by the authority authorizing the eligible company to receive incentives under KRS 139.536 and 148.851 to 148.860;

“Full-service lodging facility” means a facility that provides overnight sleeping accommodations, including private bathrooms and all of the following:

On-site dining facilities;

Room service;

Catering: and

Meeting space;

“Incentives” means the Kentucky sales tax refund as prescribed in KRS 139.536;

“Kentucky sales tax” means the sales tax imposed by KRS 139.200;

“Lodging facility project” means a full-service lodging facility that:

Is located on recreational property owned or leased by the Commonwealth or the federal government;

Involves the restoration or rehabilitation of a structure that:

Is listed individually on the National Register of Historic Places; or

Is located in the National Register Historic District; and

Is an integral part of a major convention or sports facility;

Is located:

Within a fifty (50) mile radius of a property listed on the National Register of Historic Places with a current function of recreation and culture; and

In any of the one hundred (100) least-populated counties in the Commonwealth, in terms of population density, according to the most recent census;

Is located on property:

Owned by the Commonwealth, or leased by the Commonwealth from the federal government;

Acquired for use in the state park system pursuant to KRS 148.028; and

Operated by the Kentucky Department of Parks pursuant to KRS 148.021 or the Kentucky Horse Park Commission pursuant to KRS 148.258 to 148.320;

Is located on property:

Owned or leased by the federal government and under the control of the Department of the Interior; or

Owned by the Commonwealth and in the custody of the State Fair Board as provided in KRS 247.140;

Is part of a tourism attraction project, entertainment destination center project, or theme restaurant destination attraction project and the full-service lodging facility represents less than fifty percent (50%) of the total eligible costs; or

Has not less than five hundred (500) guest rooms:

“Net positive fiscal impact” means the amount by which increased state tax revenues will exceed the incentives given;

“Preliminary approval” means the action taken by the authority conditionally approving an eligible company for the incentives under KRS 139.536 and 148.851 to 148.860;

“Recreational facility” means a structure or outdoor area that:

Provides visitors recreational opportunities, including but not limited to amusement parks, boating, hiking, horseback riding, hunting, fishing, camping, wildlife viewing, live theater, rock climbing, and all-terrain vehicle trails; and

Serves as a likely destination where individuals who are not residents of the Commonwealth would remain overnight in commercial lodging at or near the recreational facility;

“Theme restaurant destination attraction project” means a restaurant facility that meets the requirements for incentives under KRS 148.853(2)(c);

“Tourism attraction project” means:
(20) (a)

“Tourism attraction project” means:

A cultural or historical site;

A recreational facility;

An entertainment facility;

An area of natural phenomenon or scenic beauty; or

A Kentucky crafts and products center;

“Tourism attraction project” does not include facilities that are primarily devoted to the retail sale of goods, other than a Kentucky crafts and products center, or a tourism attraction where the sale of goods is a secondary and subordinate component of the attraction; and

“Tourism development project” means:

A tourism attraction project;

A theme restaurant destination attraction project;

An entertainment destination center project; or

A lodging facility project.

is certified by the Kentucky Heritage Council as contributing to the historic significance of the district, and the rehabilitation or restoration of the structure has been approved in advance by the Kentucky Heritage Council;

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2001, ch. 1, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 338, § 43, effective April 11, 2002; 2003, ch. 73, § 3, effective March 18, 2003; 2004, ch. 105, § 23, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 95, § 24, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 168, § 46, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 184, § 15, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 149, § 206, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 27, effective June 25, 2009; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 36, effective June 26, 2009; 2014, ch. 104, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

148.853.
Legislative findings — Qualifications for incentives — Incentives available.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

The general welfare and material well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth depend in large measure upon the development of tourism in the Commonwealth;

It is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to provide incentives for the creation of new tourism attractions and the expansion of existing tourism attractions within the Commonwealth in order to advance the public purposes of relieving unemployment by preserving and creating jobs that would not exist if not for the incentives offered by the authority to approved companies, and by preserving and creating sources of tax revenues for the support of public services provided by the Commonwealth;

The authorities granted by KRS 148.851 to 148.860 are proper governmental and public purposes for which public moneys may be expended; and

That the creation or expansion of tourism development projects is of paramount importance mandating that the provisions of KRS 139.536 and KRS 148.851 to 148.860 be liberally construed and applied in order to advance public purposes.

To qualify for incentives provided in KRS 139.536 and 148.851 to 148.860, the following requirements shall be met:

For a tourism attraction project:

The total eligible costs shall exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000), except for a tourism attraction project located in a county designated as an enhanced incentive county at the time the eligible company becomes an approved company as provided in KRS 148.857(6), the total eligible costs shall exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000);

In any year, including the first year of operation, the tourism attraction project shall be open to the public at least one hundred (100) days; and

In any year following the third year of operation, the tourism attraction project shall attract at least twenty-five percent (25%) of its visitors from among persons who are not residents of the Commonwealth;

For an entertainment destination center project:

The total eligible costs shall exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000);

The facility shall contain a minimum of two hundred thousand (200,000) square feet of building space adjacent or complementary to an existing tourism attraction project or a major convention facility;

The incentives shall be dedicated to a public infrastructure purpose that shall relate to the entertainment destination center project;

In any year, including the first year of operation, the entertainment destination center project shall:

Be open to the public at least one hundred (100) days per year;

Maintain at least one (1) major theme restaurant and at least three (3) additional entertainment venues, including but not limited to live entertainment, multiplex theaters, large-format theater, motion simulators, family entertainment centers, concert halls, virtual reality or other interactive games, museums, exhibitions, or other cultural and leisure-time activities; and

Maintain a minimum occupancy of sixty percent (60%) of the total gross area available for lease with entertainment and food and drink options not including the retail sale of tangible personal property; and

In any year following the third year of operation, the entertainment destination center project shall attract at least twenty-five percent (25%) of its visitors from among persons who are not residents of the Commonwealth;

For a theme restaurant destination attraction project:

The total eligible costs shall exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000);

In any year, including the first year of operation, the attraction shall:

Be open to the public at least three hundred (300) days per year and for at least eight (8) hours per day; and

Generate no more than fifty percent (50%) of its revenue through the sale of alcoholic beverages;

In any year following the third year of operation, the theme restaurant destination attraction project shall attract a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of its visitors from among persons who are not residents of the Commonwealth; and

The theme restaurant destination attraction project shall:

At the time of final approval, offer a unique dining experience that is not available in the Commonwealth within a one hundred (100) mile radius of the attraction;

In any year, including the first year of operation, maintain seating capacity of four hundred fifty (450) guests and offer live music or live musical and theatrical entertainment during the peak business hours that the facility is in operation and open to the public; or

Within three (3) years of the completion date, the attraction shall obtain a top two (2) tier rating by a nationally accredited service and shall maintain a top two (2) tier rating through the term of the agreement;

For a lodging facility project:

The eligible costs shall exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) unless the provisions of subdivision b. of this subparagraph apply.
1. a.

The eligible costs shall exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) unless the provisions of subdivision b. of this subparagraph apply.

If the lodging facility is an integral part of a major convention or sports facility, the eligible costs shall exceed six million dollars ($6,000,000); and
b. i.

If the lodging facility is an integral part of a major convention or sports facility, the eligible costs shall exceed six million dollars ($6,000,000); and

If the lodging facility includes five hundred (500) or more guest rooms, the eligible costs shall exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000); and

In any year, including the first year of operation, the lodging facility shall:

Be open to the public at least one hundred (100) days; and

Attract at least twenty-five percent (25%) of its visitors from among persons who are not residents of the Commonwealth;

Any tourism development project shall not be eligible for incentives if it includes material determined to be lewd, offensive, or deemed to have a negative impact on the tourism industry in the Commonwealth; and

An expansion of any tourism development project shall in all cases be treated as a new stand-alone project.

The incentives offered under the Kentucky Tourism Development Act shall be as follows:

An approved company may be granted a sales tax incentive based on the Kentucky sales tax imposed on sales generated by or arising at the tourism development project; and

For a tourism development project other than a lodging facility project described in KRS 148.851(14)(e) or (f), or a tourism attraction project described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph:
(b) 1.

For a tourism development project other than a lodging facility project described in KRS 148.851(14)(e) or (f), or a tourism attraction project described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph:

A sales tax incentive shall be allowed to an approved company over a period of ten (10) years, except as provided in subparagraph 5. of this paragraph; and

The sales tax incentive shall not exceed the lesser of the total amount of the sales tax liability of the approved company and its lessees or a percentage of the approved costs as specified by the agreement, not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%);

For a tourism attraction project located in an enhanced incentive county at the time the eligible company becomes an approved company as provided in KRS 148.857(6):

A sales tax incentive shall be allowed to the approved company over a period of ten (10) years; and

The sales tax incentive shall not exceed the lesser of the total amount of the sales tax liability of the approved company and its lessees or a percentage of the approved costs as specified by the agreement, not to exceed thirty percent (30%);

For a lodging facility project described in KRS 148.851(14)(e) or (f):

A sales tax incentive shall be allowed to the approved company over a period of twenty (20) years; and

The sales tax incentive shall not exceed the lesser of total amount of the sales tax liability of the approved company and its lessees or a percentage of the approved costs as specified by the agreement, not to exceed fifty percent (50%);

Any unused incentives from a previous year may be carried forward to any succeeding year during the term of the agreement until the entire specified percentage of the approved costs has been received through sales tax incentives; and

If the approved company is an entertainment destination center that has dedicated at least thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of the incentives provided under the agreement to a public infrastructure purpose, the agreement may be amended to extend the term of the agreement up to two (2) additional years if the approved company agrees to:

Reinvest in the original entertainment destination project one hundred percent (100%) of any incentives received during the extension that were outstanding at the end of the original term of the agreement; and

Report to the authority at the end of each fiscal year the amount of incentives received during the extension and how the incentives were reinvested in the original entertainment destination project.

HISTORY:
Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2001, ch. 1, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 37, effective June 26, 2009; 2014, ch. 104, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 132, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

148.8531.
Application period for sales tax incentive under KRS 148.853(3)(b)2.

New applications shall not be accepted or considered before August 1, 2014, or after May 1, 2018, for the sales tax incentive provided in KRS 148.853(3)(b)2. All projects with preliminary or final approval under KRS 148.851 to 148.860 on July 31, 2018, shall continue to be governed by KRS 148.851 to 148.860.

History.
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 104, § 3, effective July 15, 2014.

148.854.
Legacy expansion projects — Purpose — Eligibility for incentives — Incentives available — Application, approval, and monitoring process — Term of agreement — Analysis of positive fiscal impact — Legislative findings.

As used in this section:

“Legacy expansion project” means an expansion project approved under this section; and

“Premier event” means a sports event that:

Is in the premier series or top sanctioned level of all similar types of events staged on a national basis; and

Is broadcast nationally.

The purpose of this section is to encourage the location of premier events in the Commonwealth.

To qualify for incentives under this section, an eligible company or its assignee shall:

Have an existing project under KRS 148.851 to 148.860 that was approved prior to June 26, 2009;

Invest a minimum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in the expansion of the previously approved project;

Present one (1) or more new premier events on an annual basis at the legacy expansion project site. As used in this paragraph, “new premier event” means a premier event that was not presented at the existing project prior to approval of the legacy expansion project; and

Include a facility with a permanent seating capacity of sixty-five thousand (65,000) or more, where premier events will be held.

An approved company meeting the requirements established by subsection (3) of this section shall be eligible to recover the following:

Up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the approved costs expended for the legacy expansion project; and

One hundred percent (100%) of any amounts outstanding under the agreement for the original project between the approved company, or any assignee of the approved company, and the authority.

To obtain the incentives authorized pursuant to this section, an eligible company that meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section shall file an application for a legacy expansion project with the authority. The legacy expansion project shall be reviewed and evaluated as a new project under KRS 148.851 to 148.860, and the application and review process established in KRS 148.851 to 148.860 shall apply, except as otherwise provided in this section. The cabinet may establish requirements and guidelines for the review and approval of projects under this section that are different from, or in addition to the requirements and guidelines established for the review of projects in general under KRS 148.851 to 148.860.

The application required under subsection (5) of this section shall include a plan describing the eligible company’s efforts to promote the hiring of Kentucky residents to be employed in the construction and operation of the legacy expansion project.
(6) (a)

The application required under subsection (5) of this section shall include a plan describing the eligible company’s efforts to promote the hiring of Kentucky residents to be employed in the construction and operation of the legacy expansion project.

The plan shall be submitted in a format, and with sufficient detail to demonstrate that the eligible company has evaluated the following factors in the development of its plan:

An analysis of its specific need to employ particular occupations, skills, trades, and technical expertise in the construction and operation of the legacy expansion project;

An estimate of the total number of individuals expected to be employed in the construction and operation of the legacy expansion project, which shall include a categorization of construction phase and operational phase employment projections;

An analysis of the specific need to employ individuals skilled in specialized tasks or in the operation of specialized equipment unique to the construction or operation of the legacy expansion project, together with an evaluation of the availability of sufficiently skilled laborers within the Commonwealth who may be employed to perform the specialized tasks identified or to work with particular specialized equipment;

An analysis of the labor market conditions in Kentucky counties in the vicinity of the legacy expansion project at the time construction of the project is ongoing and during the time at which operations at the project commence, which shall include the eligible company’s estimates of the availability of Kentucky laborers of sufficient skill, training, and expertise to perform the work the company requires, during both the construction and operational phases of the project; and

An analysis of any other factor the authority and the eligible company may agree upon.

The plan may include any other items the authority and the eligible company may agree upon.

The plan may include an expression of hiring targets and preferences for Kentucky residents in a format and with the detail that the authority and eligible company may agree upon.
3. a.

The plan may include an expression of hiring targets and preferences for Kentucky residents in a format and with the detail that the authority and eligible company may agree upon.

The benchmark hiring target for the construction phase shall be to hire one hundred percent (100%) of contractors from contractors with facilities in Kentucky, and the benchmark hiring target for the operations phase shall be the employment of workers, of whom at least seventy-five percent (75%) are Kentucky residents.

Notwithstanding the benchmark targets established by subdivision b. of this subparagraph, the authority and eligible company may agree upon specific hiring targets after consideration of the analyses required by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.

The plan may set forth preferences for use of materials manufactured in Kentucky, so long as they are competitively priced.

In no event shall hiring benchmarks, hiring targets, or any preferences take precedence over the results of a competitive bidding process.

The authority shall not approve the application required by subsection (5) of this section until the eligible company has submitted the plan required by this subsection, and the plan has been evaluated and approved by the authority.

An approved company shall report annually to the authority concerning its compliance with the terms of its plan.

The authority shall review the annual reports filed by an approved company in relation to an approved company’s approved plan to determine compliance with the plan. If the authority determines that the approved company has substantially failed to comply with the terms of its plan, the authority may take reasonably necessary measures to ensure compliance with the plan, including but not limited to the withholding of the incentives authorized by this section. If the authority has determined that the approved company has substantially failed to comply with the terms of its plan, it shall provide the eligible company with written notice of this determination, and the eligible company shall be provided a reasonable opportunity to cure any deficiencies prior to the withholding of any incentives.

The initial term of an agreement entered into under this section shall be ten (10) years. During each year of the agreement term, the approved company shall be eligible to recover one-tenth (1/10) of the total incentives approved by the authority.
(7) (a)

The initial term of an agreement entered into under this section shall be ten (10) years. During each year of the agreement term, the approved company shall be eligible to recover one-tenth (1/10) of the total incentives approved by the authority.

If, at the end of the original ten (10) year term of the legacy expansion project agreement, the approved company has not claimed all of the approved incentives available under the legacy expansion project agreement, the authority shall extend the term of the agreement by one (1) year for each year during the original ten (10) year term of the agreement that the approved company met or exceeded the requirements established by subsection (3)(c) of this section. The term of the legacy expansion project agreement, including all extensions, shall not exceed twenty (20) years, and the amount of recovery during each year that the agreement is extended shall be determined on a pro rata basis, based upon the total number of years for which the agreement is extended.

The Kentucky General Assembly recognizes that the benefits accruing to the Commonwealth from a legacy expansion project include benefits beyond those that would typically be considered in making the determination required by KRS 148.855(4)(c). Therefore, the analysis of positive fiscal impact required by KRS 148.855(4)(c) and (5) shall include an accounting of the following social benefits:

The positive impact that the legacy expansion project will have on the existing tourism attraction project;

The positive impact the legacy expansion project will have on other tourism attractions that will receive increased visitation due to the existence of the legacy expansion project; and

The positive impacts that will accrue to the economy of the Commonwealth from the national and international exposure the legacy expansion project is expected to provide.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 55, effective June 26, 2009.

148.855.
Evaluation standards — Tourism attraction project applications —
Consulting services — Optional interagency review — Cabinet recommendations.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish standards for the making of applications for incentives and the recommendation of eligible companies and their tourism development projects to the authority.

The cabinet shall consult with the authority when establishing standards to ensure that standards established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and KRS 148.857(1) do not conflict.

The application for incentives shall be filed with the cabinet and shall include:
(3) (a)

The application for incentives shall be filed with the cabinet and shall include:

The name of the applicant;

Marketing plans for the tourism development project that target individuals who are not residents of the Commonwealth;

A description and location of the tourism development project;

Capital and other anticipated expenditures for the tourism development project that indicate that the total cost of the project shall exceed the minimum required costs as provided in KRS 148.853, and the anticipated sources of funding therefor;

The anticipated employment and wages to be paid at the tourism development project;

Business plans which indicate the average number of days in a year in which the tourism development project will be in operation and open to the public;

The anticipated revenues and expenses generated by the tourism development project;

If the tourism development project is an entertainment destination center project, the application shall include the public infrastructure purpose; and

Any other information as required by the cabinet.

Based upon a review of these materials, if the cabinet determines that the eligible company and the proposed tourism development project appears to meet the requirements established by KRS 148.853, and that the proposed tourism development project may reasonably satisfy the criteria for final approval in subsection (4) of this section, the secretary of the cabinet may submit a written request to the authority for a preliminary approval of the eligible company and the tourism development project.

The authority may review the request submitted by the secretary, including all relevant materials, and may, based upon that review, grant preliminary approval to an eligible company. Upon a preliminary approval by the authority, the cabinet shall engage the services of a competent consulting firm to analyze the data made available by the eligible company and to collect and analyze additional information necessary to determine that, in the independent judgment of the consultant, the proposed tourism development project:

Will attract, in all years following the third year of operation, at least twenty-five percent (25%) of its visitors from among persons who are not residents of the Commonwealth, except for a theme restaurant destination attraction project, which shall attract, in all years following the third year of operation, a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of its visitors from among persons who are not residents of the Commonwealth;

Will have costs in excess of the minimum amount required by KRS 148.853;

Will have a net positive fiscal impact on the Commonwealth considering, among other factors, the extent to which the proposed tourism development project will compete directly with existing tourism attractions or previously approved tourism development projects in the Commonwealth and the amount by which increased tax revenues from the tourism development project will exceed the incentives given to the approved company at the maximum level of recovery of approved costs as provided in KRS 148.853; or
(c) 1.

Will have a net positive fiscal impact on the Commonwealth considering, among other factors, the extent to which the proposed tourism development project will compete directly with existing tourism attractions or previously approved tourism development projects in the Commonwealth and the amount by which increased tax revenues from the tourism development project will exceed the incentives given to the approved company at the maximum level of recovery of approved costs as provided in KRS 148.853; or

If the independent consultant determines that the proposed tourism development project cannot produce a net positive fiscal impact to the Commonwealth at the maximum level of recovery of approved costs as provided in KRS 148.853, the independent consultant shall determine the level of recovery, if any, at which the proposed tourism development project can meet those standards;

Will produce sufficient revenues and public demand to be operating and open to the public for a minimum of one hundred (100) days per year, except for a theme restaurant destination attraction, which shall be operating and open to the public for a minimum of three hundred (300) days per year;

Will not adversely affect existing employment in the Commonwealth; and

Meets all other requirements of KRS 148.851 and 148.853.

The independent consultant, in determining the amount of net positive fiscal impact to the Commonwealth for a new proposed tourism development project that is an expansion of an existing tourism development project shall not consider positive fiscal impacts from the following sources:

Increased operations at the previously approved tourism development project that is being expanded by the proposed tourism development project;

Increased operations at any other tourism development project approved for incentives provided under KRS 148.853; or

Increased operations at any project approved for tax increment financing that includes state revenues approved pursuant to Subchapter 30 of KRS Chapter 154.

The independent consultant shall consult with the authority, the Office of the State Budget Director and the Finance and Administration Cabinet in the development of a report on the proposed tourism development project.
(6) (a)

The independent consultant shall consult with the authority, the Office of the State Budget Director and the Finance and Administration Cabinet in the development of a report on the proposed tourism development project.

The Office of the State Budget Director and the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall agree as to the methodology to be used and assumptions to be made by the independent consultant in preparing its report.

On the basis of the independent consultant’s report and prior to any final approval of a project by the authority, the Office of the State Budget Director and the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall certify to the authority whether there is a projected net positive fiscal impact to the Commonwealth and the expected amount of incremental state revenues from the tourism development project. A final approval shall not be granted if it is determined that there is no projected net positive fiscal impact to the Commonwealth.

The eligible company shall pay for the cost of the consultant’s report and shall cooperate with the consultant and provide all of the data that the consultant deems necessary to make its determination under subsection (4) of this section.

In lieu of the independent consultant analysis required in subsection (4) of this section, if the eligible company is exempt from income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and the estimated approved costs are less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000), the cabinet shall have the option of performing an interagency review to analyze the data made available by the eligible company and to collect and analyze additional information necessary to determine that the proposed tourism development project meets the requirements set forth in subsection (4)(a) of this section. The cabinet shall comply with the same consulting and reporting requirements as an independent consultant.

After a review of relevant materials, the consultant’s report, and completion of other inquiries, the secretary shall, by written notification to the authority, provide a recommendation to the authority regarding final approval of the tourism development project.

History.
Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2001, ch. 1, § 4, effective June 21, 2001; 2003, ch. 73, § 4, effective March 18, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 564, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 25, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 28, effective June 25, 2009; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 38, effective June 26, 2009.